Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2273.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5806 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 5806. Motion for return of property.* * *(c) Documents to be provided.--Within 14 days following the seizure of a person's personal property by a law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency shall provide the following documents to the person aggrieved by the seizure:(1) A copy of this section. (2) A copy of a sample motion for return of property. The sample motion:(i) Shall be developed by the Administrative Office 12345678910111213141516171819 of Pennsylvania Courts.(ii) Shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts.(iii) Shall not be intended to be the exclusive form of motion accepted by a court of common pleas.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Law enforcement agency." The Pennsylvania State Police or a local law enforcement agency."Local law enforcement agency." A police department of a city, borough, incorporated town or township or campus police.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2273PN2973 - 2 - 1234567891011121314